Massachusetts, session 194th, H2130.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 148B of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by striking out paragraph (a) and inserting in place thereof the
following new paragraph:-
(a) For the purpose of this chapter and chapter 151, an individual performing any service,
except as authorized under this chapter, shall be considered to be an employee under those
chapters unless:- (1) the individual is free from control and direction in connection with the
performance of the service, both under his contract for the performance of service and in fact;
and (2) the service is performed outside the usual course of the business of the employer; or, (3)
the individual is customarily engaged in an independently established trade, occupation,
profession or business of the same nature as that involved in the service performed.
of 1